New York, session 2025-2026, A1767.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 5-304 of the election law, as 2 amended by chapter 316 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. A change of enrollment received by the board of elections [will 5 take effect immediately, provided however, any change of enrollment 6 received by the board of elections after February fourteenth and before 7 or on seven days after the June primary shall take effect on the seventh 8 day after the June primary] showing a dated cancellation mark of the 9 United States Postal Service, or contained in an envelope showing such a 10 dated cancellation mark which is dated not later than the twenty-fifth 11 day before the next ensuing primary, general, or special election, and 12 received no later than the twentieth day before such election, or deliv- 13 ered in person to such county board of elections not later than the 14 tenth day before a special election, shall have such change of enroll- 15 ment effective for such election. Enrollment changes shall be entered as 16 provided in this article and will be deemed to take effect on the twen- 17 ty-fifth day after such change of enrollment is received by the board of 18 elections or if the change of enrollment, or the envelope containing it, 19 bears a dated cancellation mark of the United States Postal Service, 20 such change shall be entered and will be deemed to take effect on the 21 twenty-fifth day after the date of such mark, whichever is earlier; 22 except that no change will take effect sooner than the twentieth day 23 after the receipt of such change of enrollment by the board of elections 24 except with regard to special elections as provided in this subdivision. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04706-01-5